New Jersey, session 222, S812.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A public institution of higher education shall award academic credit to a volunteer emergency responder enrolled in the institution, provided that: (1)  the student is enrolled in an undergraduate degree-granting program; (2)  the volunteer service was performed within five years before the students initial enrollment in the institution or is being performed concurrently with the students enrollment in the institution; (3)  the student provides proof to the institution of the number of volunteer hours performed; (4)  the student volunteered with a volunteer fire company, duly incorporated first aid, rescue, or ambulance squad, or a county or municipal volunteer Office of Emergency Management, provided the students official duties include responding to a fire or emergency call; and (5)  the student held the appropriate certificate while performing the volunteer service, as applicable. b.  Academic credit shall be awarded commensurate with the number of hours the student served as a volunteer emergency responder and shall be applied toward relevant coursework offered by the institution. c.  The Secretary of Higher Education shall develop credit recommendations for a public institution of higher education to award academic credit pursuant to subsection a. of this section. d.  Nothing in this section shall be construed to require any public institution of higher education to admit a student or to waive its admission standards and application procedures. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the first full academic year following the date of enactment.